New York, session 2025-2026, S3361.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 461-l of the social services law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 3 (e) Medical evaluations. Medical evaluations used to determine that 4 the assisted living program can support the physical, supervisory and 5 psycho-social needs of a resident must be conducted within thirty days 6 prior to the date of admission and signed by either a physician, physi- 7 cian assistant or nurse practitioner. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04749-01-5